Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1543
Unlawful destruction or possession of ballot or ballot box; penalty.

Any person who unlawfully attempts to destroy a ballot or who unlawfully, by force, violence, fraud, or other improper means, obtains or attempts to obtain possession of a ballot box or a ballot which was deposited in a ballot box while the voting at the election is going on or before the ballots have been duly taken out of the ballot box by a judge of election shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 442.